Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-271
Township organization; adoption; pending business; disposition.

Any incompleted matter or business pending before any board of county commissioners of any county, upon the adoption of township organization by such county, shall be completed and disposed of by the new board the same as if commenced before it.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 74, p. 153;

R.S.1913, § 1055;

C.S.1922, § 957;

C.S.1929, § 26-271;

R.S.1943, § 23-271.